Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,109
Public parks; conveyance to school districts; use.

Any such real estate conveyed under the provisions of section 79-10,108 may be used by such school district only in the manner and to the extent that other real estate owned by such school district may be used.

Laws 1937, c. 36, § 2, p. 165;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-2902;

R.S.1943, § 79-2145;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 184, p. 752;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,146;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 755.